Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Mine Safety Analysis

351.241.
Statement of General Assembly.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares the following:

Thousands of Kentuckians enter underground mines each day to produce coal that is so vital to the economy of our nation and the well-being of its people.

The underground coal mine is a hazardous environment that constantly requires the highest degree of safety consciousness on the part of every individual.

Despite training and a variety of safety efforts, each year coal mines continue to take a heavy human toll: large numbers of miners are injured; many are left permanently disabled; and a lesser number pay the ultimate price—death.

Many activities are performed by a variety of persons; therefore, each coal miner is expected to learn and perform a large number of tasks.

Miners frequently become engaged in unfamiliar tasks when substituting for others or assisting a fellow worker.

The American zeal for work and productivity very frequently causes the miner to give second priority to normal safety measures and precautions.

Studies have demonstrated that experienced persons observing and providing on-the-job counseling to individual miners regarding their work habits can bring about a significant reduction in underground mine accidents and fatalities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 1.

351.242.
Mine safety analysis program — Responsibility and powers of mine safety specialists.

There is hereby created in the department a mine safety analysis program.

Mine safety specialists employed in the department and conducting underground or surface mine safety analysis shall satisfy the applicable requirements established in KRS

351.090

.

A primary responsibility of the mine safety specialist is to prevent mine accidents and fatalities by observing and evaluating the work habits of persons involved in the direct production of coal and to contact, advise, and assist these persons in correcting their unsafe or potentially hazardous actions.

Each time a mine safety specialist enters a mine to perform mine safety analysis, he or she shall confer with the foreman as to the conditions of the mine and the work practices of the employees.

The mine safety specialist shall keep mine management, representatives of the employees, and the commissioner informed about all hazardous conditions and all matters which may improve the safety of mines.

The division shall assist the department in assessing the effectiveness of miner training programs.

The commissioner shall at his or her discretion assign mine safety specialists to all mines in the state taking into consideration such factors as the history of accidents at the mine, experience of the workforce, physical condition of the mine, and size of the mine.

The commissioner may coordinate the assignment of mine safety specialists with the appropriate federal authorities to minimize duplication of accident prevention efforts.

The commissioner shall report annually to the General Assembly and to the Governor on the effectiveness of the mine safety specialists in improving mine safety.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 2; 1996, ch. 308, § 18, effective April 9, 1996; 1998, ch. 480, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 123, § 60, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 87, § 26, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.243.
Responsibilities and duties of mine safety analysts not to limit those provided in KRS Chapters 351 and 352 for other persons.

The responsibilities and duties assigned to the mine safety analyst shall not be construed to limit in any way the responsibilities and duties provided in KRS Chapters 351 and 352 for any other person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 3.